Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1077
Continuing competency requirements; waiver; limited exemptions.

The department, with the recommendation of the board, may waive continuing competency requirements, in part or in total, for any two-year licensing period when a licensee submits documentation that circumstances beyond his or her control prevented completion of such requirements as provided in section 38-146. In addition to circumstances determined by the department to be beyond the licensee's control pursuant to such section, the following exemptions shall apply:

(1) An instructor who meets the continuing competency requirements for the instructor's license shall be exempt from meeting the continuing competency requirements for his or her cosmetologist license for that biennium;

(2) An electrology instructor who meets the continuing competency requirements for the electrology instructor's license shall be exempt from meeting the continuing competency requirements for his or her electrologist license for that biennium; and

(3) An esthetics instructor who meets the continuing education requirements for the esthetics instructor's license shall be exempt from meeting the continuing education requirements for his or her esthetician license for that biennium.

Laws 1986, LB 318, § 78;

Laws 1995, LB 83, § 37;

Laws 2002, LB 241, § 31;

Laws 2002, LB 1021, § 46;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-3,117;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 339.